en: E-Book Reader Batteries
xx: E-Book Reader Batteries
cs: Baterie do čteček elektronických knih
da: Batterier til e-bogslæsere
de: Batterien für E-Book-Reader
es: Baterías para lectores de libros electrónicos
fr: Batteries pour liseuses numériques
it: Batterie per lettori di e-book
ja: 電子書籍リーダー用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor e-readers
no: Batterier til lesebrett
pl: Baterie do czytników e-booków
pt: Baterias para leitores de e-books
ru: Батареи для устройств для чтения электронных книг
sv: Batterier för e-bokläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucu Bataryaları

en: General Purpose Batteries
xx: General Purpose Batteries
cs: Víceúčelové baterie
da: Generelle batterier
de: Mehrzweckbatterien
es: Baterías multiusos
fr: Piles et batteries multiusages
it: Batterie multiuso
ja: 汎用バッテリー
nl: Standaardaccu's en -batterijen
no: Batterier til generell bruk
pl: Akumulatory do zastosowań ogólnych
pt: Baterias multiuso
ru: Батареи и аккумуляторы общего назначения
sv: Batterier för allmänt bruk
tr: Genel Amaçlı Piller

en: Laptop Batteries
xx: Laptop Batteries
cs: Baterie do notebooků
da: Bærbar computer – batterier
de: Laptopakkus
es: Baterías para portátiles
fr: Batteries pour ordinateurs portables
it: Batterie per portatili
ja: ノートPC用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor laptops
no: Batterier til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Akumulatory do laptopów
pt: Baterias de laptop
ru: Аккумуляторы для ноутбуков
sv: Batterier till bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Bataryaları

en: MP3 Player Batteries
xx: MP3 Player Batteries
cs: Baterie do přehrávačů MP3
da: Batterier til MP3-afspillere
de: MP3-Player-Batterien
es: Baterías para reproductores de MP3
fr: Batteries de lecteurs MP3
it: Batterie per lettori MP3
ja: MP3プレーヤー用バッテリー
nl: Batterijen voor mp3-spelers
no: Batterier til MP3-spillere
pl: Baterie do odtwarzaczy mp3
pt: Baterias para MP3 player
ru: Аккумуляторы для MP3-плееров
sv: Batterier för MP3-spelare
tr: MP3 Çalar Bataryaları

en: Mobile Phone Batteries
xx: Mobile Phone Batteries
cs: Baterie do mobilních telefonů
da: Mobiltelefon – batterier
de: Handy-Akkus
es: Baterías para móviles
fr: Batteries pour téléphones mobiles
it: Batterie cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor mobiele telefoons
no: Batterier til mobiltelefoner
pl: Baterie do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Baterias de celulares
ru: Аккумуляторы для мобильных телефонов
sv: Mobiltelefonbatterier
tr: Cep Telefonu Bataryaları

en: PDA Batteries
xx: PDA Batteries
cs: Baterie pro PDA
da: PDA – batterier
de: PDA-Batterien
es: Baterías para PDA
fr: Batteries pour PDA
it: Batterie PDA
ja: PDA用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor PDA's
no: PDA-batterier
pl: Baterie do PDA
pt: Baterias para PDA
ru: Аккумуляторы для КПК
sv: Handdatorbatterier
tr: PDA Bataryaları

en: Tablet Computer Batteries
xx: Tablet Computer Batteries
cs: Baterie do tabletů
da: Batterier til tablets
de: Akkus für Tablet-Computer
es: Baterías para tablets
fr: Batteries pour tablettes PC
it: Batterie per tablet
ja: タブレットPC用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor tablets
no: Batterier til nettbrett
pl: Baterie do tabletów
pt: Baterias para tablets
ru: Батареи для планшетных ПК
sv: Batterier till surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Bataryaları

en: UPS Batteries
xx: UPS Batteries
cs: Záložní zdroje
da: UPS – batterier
de: USV-Batterien
es: Baterías para SAI
fr: Batteries d'onduleurs
it: Batterie UPS
ja: UPS用バッテリー
nl: UPS-accu's, accu's voor noodstroomvoeding
no: Batterier til avbruddsfrie strømforsyninger
pl: Akumulatory do zasilaczy UPS
pt: Baterias UPS
ru: Батареи для ИБП
sv: UPS-batterier
tr: UPS Aküleri

en: Video Camera Batteries
xx: Video Camera Batteries
cs: Baterie do videokamer
da: Videokamera – batterier
de: Videokameraakkus & -batterien
es: Baterías para cámaras de vídeo
fr: Batteries pour caméras vidéo
it: Batterie per telecamere
ja: ビデオカメラ用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor videocamera's
no: Videokamera-batterier
pl: Akumulatory do kamer wideo
pt: Baterias para câmera de vídeo
ru: Аккумуляторы для видеокамер
sv: Videokamerabatterier
tr: Video Kamera Bataryaları

en: Video Game Console & Controller Batteries
xx: Video Game Console & Controller Batteries
cs: Baterie do herních konzolí a ovladačů
da: Batterier til spillekonsoller og controllere
de: Batterien für Videospielkonsolen & Game-Controller
es: Baterías para mandos y videoconsolas
fr: Batteries pour consoles de jeu vidéo et manettes
it: Batterie per controller e console per videogiochi
ja: ゲーム機本体・コントローラー用バッテリー
nl: Batterijen voor consoles en controllers van videogames
no: Batterier til videospillkonsoller og -kontroller
pl: Akumulatory do konsol do gier i kontrolerów
pt: Baterias para controles e consoles de video game
ru: Аккумуляторы для игровых приставок и пультов управления
sv: Batterier till tv-spelskonsol och handkontroller
tr: Video Oyun Konsolu ve Kumandası Bataryaları

en: Battery Accessories
xx: Battery Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k bateriím
da: Batteri – tilbehør
de: Batteriezubehör
es: Accesorios de baterías
fr: Accessoires pour batteries
it: Accessori batteria
ja: バッテリー関連用品
nl: Accu-accessoires
no: Batteritilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do akumulatorów
pt: Acessórios para bateria
ru: Принадлежности для батарей
sv: Batteritillbehör
tr: Batarya Aksesuarları

en: Battery Charge Controllers
xx: Battery Charge Controllers
cs: Regulátory pro nabíjecí zdroje
da: Laderegulatorer
de: Laderegler
es: Controladores de carga
fr: Régulateurs de charge pour batteries
it: Sistemi per controllare la carica delle batterie
ja: チャージコントローラー
nl: Laadregelaars
no: Batteriladingsregulatorer
pl: Kontrolery ładowania
pt: Controladores de carga
ru: Устройства регулирования зарядки
sv: Laddningsregulatorer
tr: Şarj Kontrol Cihazları

en: Battery Holders
xx: Battery Holders
cs: Držáky na baterie
da: Batteriholdere
de: Batteriehalter
es: Portapilas
fr: Porte-batteries
it: Contenitori per batterie
ja: 電池ホルダー
nl: Batterijhouders
no: Batteriholdere
pl: Gniazda baterii
pt: Compartimentos de pilhas e baterias
ru: Держатели для аккумуляторов
sv: Batterihållare
tr: Batarya Tutucular

en: Camera Battery Chargers
xx: Camera Battery Chargers
cs: Nabíječky baterií do fotoaparátu
da: Kamera – batteriopladere
de: Akkuladegeräte für Kameras
es: Cargadores de baterías para cámaras
fr: Chargeurs de batteries de caméras
it: Caricabatterie fotocamera
ja: カメラ用充電器
nl: Acculaders voor camera's
no: Kamerabatteriladere
pl: Ładowarki do akumulatorów do aparatów
pt: Carregadores de bateria para câmera
ru: Зарядные устройства для камер
sv: Laddare till kamerabatterier
tr: Kamera Bataryası Şarj Aletleri

en: General Purpose Battery Chargers
xx: General Purpose Battery Chargers
cs: Víceúčelové nabíječky baterií
da: Batteriopladere – generelt
de: Batterieladegeräte
es: Cargadores de baterías de uso general
fr: Chargeurs de batteries pour usage courant
it: Caricabatteria universali
ja: 汎用充電器
nl: Universele acculaders
no: Batteriladere til generell bruk
pl: Ładowarki do akumulatorów do zastosowań ogólnych
pt: Carregadores de bateria de uso geral
ru: Зарядные устройства для аккумуляторов общего назначения
sv: Laddare till allmänna batterier
tr: Genel Amaçlı Pil Şarj Aletleri

en: General Purpose Battery Testers
xx: General Purpose Battery Testers
cs: Univerzální zkoušečky baterií
da: Batteritestere
de: Universal-Batterieprüfgeräte
es: Comprobadores de baterías de uso general
fr: Testeurs de batterie pour usage courant
it: Tester di batterie generici
ja: 汎用バッテリー テスター
nl: Universele accutesters
no: Batteritestere til generell bruk
pl: Testery baterii do ogólnego zastosowania
pt: Testadores de bateria para fins gerais
ru: Тестеры батареек
sv: Batteri för allmänt bruk
tr: Genel Amaçlı Pil Kontrol Cihazları

en: Fuel Cells
xx: Fuel Cells
cs: Palivové články
da: Brændselsceller
de: Brennstoffzellen
es: Pilas de combustible
fr: Piles à combustible
it: Celle a combustibile
ja: 燃料電池
nl: Brandstofcellen
no: Brenselsceller
pl: Ogniwa paliwowe
pt: Células de combustível
ru: Топливные элементы
sv: Bränsleceller
tr: Yakıt Pilleri

en: Power Adapter & Charger Accessories
xx: Power Adapter & Charger Accessories
cs: Napájecí adaptéry a nabíječky – příslušenství
da: Strømforsyning og opladertilbehør
de: Netzteil- & Ladegerätezubehör
es: Accesorios para cargadores y adaptadores de corriente
fr: Accessoires pour adaptateurs de courant et chargeurs
it: Accessori per caricabatteria e adattatori di corrente
ja: 電源アダプター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor netspanningsadapters
no: Tilbehør til strømadaptere og -ladere
pl: Akcesoria do zasilaczy
pt: Acessórios para adaptadores de energia
ru: Принадлежности для адаптеров электропитания
sv: Tillbehör till strömadaptrar
tr: Güç Adaptörü ve Şarj Cihazı Aksesuarları

en: Power Adapters & Chargers
xx: Power Adapters & Chargers
cs: Napájecí adaptéry a nabíječky
da: Strømforsyninger og opladere
de: Netzteile & Ladegeräte
es: Cargadores y adaptadores de alimentación
fr: Adaptateurs de courant et chargeurs
it: Caricabatteria e adattatori
ja: 電源アダプター・充電器
nl: Stroomadapters en opladers
no: Strømadaptere og -ladere
pl: Zasilacze i ładowarki
pt: Carregadores e adaptadores de energia
ru: Адаптеры питания и зарядные устройства
sv: Nätadaptrar och laddare
tr: Güç Adaptörleri ve Şarj Aletleri

en: Power Control Units
xx: Power Control Units
cs: Jednotky řízení napájení
da: Strøm – kontrolenheder
de: Leistungsregler
es: Unidades de control eléctrico
fr: Blocs d'alimentation
it: Unità di controllo della potenza
ja: パワーコントロールユニット
nl: Units voor stoombeheersing
no: Strømkontrollenheter
pl: Moduły PCU
pt: Unidades de transmissão
ru: Регуляторы мощности
sv: Strömkontrollenheter
tr: Güç Kontrol Üniteleri